Washington statutes.
RCW 19.390.070

Materials submitted to the attorney general.

Information submitted to the attorney general pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained and used by the attorney general in the same manner and under the same protections as provided in RCW 19.86.110. The information, including documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony produced pursuant to a demand or copies, must not, unless otherwise ordered by a superior court for good cause shown, be produced for inspection or copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW by the person who produced the material, answered written interrogatories or gave oral testimony. Nothing in this chapter limits the attorney general's authority under RCW 19.86.110 or 19.86.115. Nothing in this chapter expands the attorney general's authority under chapter 19.86 RCW, federal or state antitrust law, or any other law. Failure to comply with this chapter does not provide a private cause of action.

[ 2019 c 267 s 7.]